Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 353.22.1 of Title 59, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Upon approval by the federal Food and Drug Administration of
ivermectin for over-the-counter use, a pharmacist may dispense
ivermectin for human use to a patient without requiring a
prescription from a licensed prescriber, in accordance with any
written standardized procedures or protocols issued by the State
Board of Pharmacy including, if required, providing the patient with
instructions on the proper use of ivermectin.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2014 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacist acting in a
reasonably prudent manner is not criminally or civilly liable or
subject to professional disciplinary action for dispensing
ivermectin in accordance with this section.
C. The State Board of Pharmacy may promulgate rules necessary
to implement this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall only become effective upon the
certification by the State Board of Pharmacy that the federal Food
and Drug Administration has approved ivermectin for over-the-counter
use.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
March 2, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS













SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2014 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)